Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Mass Transit Projects

13-10-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Local government” means an incorporated municipality, county, agency or instrumentality of an incorporated municipality or county, two (2) or more of the foregoing acting jointly, or an authority established by law to provide mass transportation services, or a nonprofit corporation authorized to provide mass transportation services;

“Mass transportation project” means the planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance or operation of any mass transportation system or capital equipment used in connection therewith;

“Project cost” means actual or estimated cost of a mass transportation project, including relocation assistance payments, or the estimated reasonable cost thereof as approved by the commissioner, whichever is lower, less any federal assistance received or to be received for the project; and

“Rail fixed guideway public transportation system” has the same meaning as provided in 49 CFR Part 674.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 2; 1973, ch. 140, § 4; 1977, ch. 276, §§ 2-5; T.C.A., § 13-1701; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 22; 2000, ch. 750, § 1; 2018, ch. 743, § 1.

Cross-References. Department of Transportation, creation, § 4-3-101.

13-10-102. Functions of commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to:

Study mass transportation problems and provide technical assistance to local governments and operators of mass transportation;

Undertake projects to develop or demonstrate improvement in mass transportation facilities, equipment, services and management techniques; acquire and operate or contract for the operation of vehicles and other equipment necessary for such projects;

Render financial assistance to local governments for mass transportation projects out of appropriations made available by the general assembly for such purpose; and

Act as agent for any local government which so requests in applying for, accepting, receiving, receipting for, and disbursing federal moneys for mass transportation projects.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 8; 1977, ch. 276, §§ 6-13; T.C.A., § 13-1702; Acts 1981, ch. 264, §§ 19, 20.

13-10-103. [Reserved.]

The commissioner, at reasonable times, may inspect the property and examine the books and papers dealing with the type and adequacy of services of any person engaged in operating a public mass transportation facility or system in whole or in part within the state. The commissioner may hold investigations or hearings within or without the state. This section shall not affect the regulatory powers of the state with respect to transportation rates and services.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 10; 1977, ch. 276, § 15; T.C.A., § 13-1704; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 22.

13-10-105, 13-10-106. [Reserved.]

Any state financial assistance for mass transportation projects undertaken by local governments may be used to pay up to one hundred percent (100%) of the project cost.

No mass transportation project shall be eligible for assistance under this chapter until the project has been approved by the commissioner as consistent with the statewide comprehensive plan for transportation approved by the commissioner and reported to the general assembly.

State moneys appropriated for any mass transportation project undertaken by local government shall be allotted pursuant to a contract entered into by the commissioner, in the name of the state, and the local government undertaking such project. The contract may include any provision agreed upon by the parties thereto, and shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project as determined by the commissioner;

An agreement by the commissioner to pay to the local government, following completion of the project, or during the undertaking thereof in the form of progress payments, such financial assistance as is provided for herein;

An agreement by the local government to:

Proceed expeditiously with and complete the project in accordance with plans approved by the commissioner;

Commence and continue operation of the project on completion of the project, and not to discontinue operation or dispose of all or part of the project without the approval of the commissioner;

Apply for, and make reasonable efforts to secure, federal assistance for the project, subject to any conditions that the commissioner may require in order to maximize the amounts of such assistance received or to be received for all projects in the state; and

Provide for the payment of the local government's share of the cost of the project; and

A provision that, if federal assistance which was not included in the calculation of the state payment pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) becomes available to the local government, the amount of the state payment shall be recalculated with the inclusion of such additional federal assistance, and the local government shall either:

Pay to the state the amount by which the state payment actually made exceeds the state payment determined by the recalculation; or

If such additional federal assistance has not been received by the local government, authorize the state to receive such amount from the federal government and to retain an appropriate amount thereof.

The commissioner shall prepare and file with the general assembly an annual report on the scope and results of construction undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

For each contract concerning a mass transportation project, the commissioner shall keep adequate records of the amount of the payment by the state pursuant to subdivision (c)(2), and of the amount of federal assistance received by the local government. These records shall be retained by the commissioner and shall establish the basis for application for federal reimbursement of payments made by the state. The commissioner may make such applications.

The commissioner may prescribe rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 13; 1973, ch. 140, § 5; 1977, ch. 276, §§ 18-24; T.C.A., § 13-1707; Acts 1980, ch. 809, § 1; 1981, ch. 264, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-10-108. Purposes for which any local government may adopt local ordinances delineated.

Any local government may adopt local ordinances to authorize:

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance or operation of one (1) or more mass transportation projects, and the use of streets, roads, highways, avenues, parks, or public places for these purposes;

The making of a contract or contracts for the acquisition by purchase of all or any part of the property, plant, and equipment of an existing mass transportation facility actually used and useful for the convenience of the public;

The making of a contract or contracts with any person, firm or corporation, including a public authority, for the equipment, maintenance or operation of a mass transportation facility owned, acquired, constructed, reconstructed or improved by the local government; and

The making of a contract or contracts for a fair and reasonable consideration for mass transportation services to be rendered to the public by a privately-owned or operated mass transportation facility. Such power shall include, but not be limited to, the power to appropriate funds for payment of such consideration, and to provide that all or part of such consideration shall be in the form of capital equipment to be furnished to and used and maintained by such privately-owned or operated mass transportation facility.

The powers granted by this section shall be in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other power to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, equip, maintain or operate any mass transportation capital project.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 14; 1977, ch. 276, § 25; T.C.A., § 13-1708.

13-10-109. Financial assistance — Approved sources.

Any local government may apply for, accept, and expend financial assistance from:

The state, for one (1) or more mass transportation projects provided pursuant to this title, whether by way of direct financial assistance or by way of prefinancing of any financial assistance from the federal government; and

The federal government, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, for the construction, operation or maintenance of one (1) or more mass transportation projects provided pursuant to any act of the congress of the United States or any rule, regulation or order promulgated pursuant thereto.

Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 15; 1977, ch. 276, §§ 26-28; T.C.A., § 13-1709.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.